District of Columbia statutes.
7-2815

Miscellaneous provisions.

(a)

In accordance with Chapter 5 of Title 2, the Mayor shall issue such rules and procedures as are necessary to implement this chapter. Except as provided by the Mayor, the Metropolitan Police Department and District of Columbia Fire Department shall be responsible for the enforcement of this chapter and the issuance of any notice of violation pursuant to § 7-2812.

(b)

If any portion of this chapter is for any reason held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, such portion shall be deemed a separate, distinct, and independent provision, and such holding shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions.

History

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 16, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(o), 35 DCR 1051

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3115.